District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.06

Remedies pursuant to other laws; severability of provisions; liberality of article construction.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive, and the remedies provided for shall be in addition to any other remedies provided for in any other law or available pursuant to common law.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 818, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-308.18.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-308.18.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.18.